Washington statutes.
RCW 33.48.025

Applicability of chapter 23B.06 RCW.

Except to the extent provided otherwise in this title, stock associations are subject to the provisions of chapter 23B.06 RCW.

[ 1991 c 72 s 51; 1982 c 3 s 91; 1981 c 84 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.